apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
    <pardef n="kaszëb/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>òwi</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ò</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óm</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="człowie/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kòwi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kã</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>kem</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cze</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>kù</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kù</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lëdz/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="slëbni/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kòwi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kã</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>kem</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kù</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kù</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kóm</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kama</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pùj/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kòwi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kù</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kù</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kã</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kama</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lëdze"><i>lëdz</i><par n="lëdz/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="człowiek"><i>człowie</i><par n="człowie/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slëbnik"><i>slëbni</i><par n="slëbni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brëkòwnik"><i>brëkòwni</i><par n="slëbni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaszëba"><i>kaszëb</i><par n="kaszëb/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pùjk"><i>pùj</i><par n="pùj/k__n"/></e>
